src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (NO vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-kerjj**
* :%^PAL A-02_SG-NOM ;		  	 (1) Sg.Nom: ǩeʹrjj
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;  (2) Pl.Nom: ǩeeʹrj
* : A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	     			    (3)  Sg.Ill: ǩerjja
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;	    (4) Sg.Loc: ǩeeʹrjest
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-COM_IN ;	    (5) Sg.Com: ǩeeʹrjin
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-COM_IN ;  (5) Sg.Com: ǩiiʹrjin
* :%^PAL%>e A-02_ESS/PAR ;  (6) Ess: ǩeʹrjjen
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^YXX2YX%> A-02_PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: ǩiiʹrjid
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%> A-02_PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: ǩeeʹrjid
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;   (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: ǩeerjaž

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (NO vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
Is for nouns with *-est* Loc, Extra long vowel
* Yaml: **N-jaurr**

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-peivv**
* :%^PAL A-02_E-STEM_SG-NOM ;	     (1) Sg.Nom: peiʹvv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_PL-NOM ;  (2) Pl.Nom: peeiʼv
* : A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL ;		       (3) Sg.Ill: pẹivva
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;	       (4) Sg.Loc: peeiʹvest
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_SG-COM_IN ;	       (5) Sg.Com: peeiʹvin
* :%^PAL%>e A-02_ESS/PAR ; 		   (6) Ess: peiʹvven
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_PL-OBL ;  (8) Pl.Acc: peeiʹvid
* :%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ;  (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: pẹẹivaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) pẹivv-
* :%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) peiʹv-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) peiʹvv Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-suekkj**

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) suäkk-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) suẹˈʹj-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) suäʹǩˈǩ Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-kuett**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) kuätt-
* :%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) kuẹʹđ-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) kuäʹtˈt- Ess+Px..

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) hiänn-
* :%^PAL%^CC2C E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) hiẹʹn-
* :%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) hiäʹnˈn- Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
## (1) Sg.Nom: vuẹiʹvv
## (2) Pl.Nom: vuẹiʼv
## (3) Sg.Ill: vuäivva
## (4) Sg.Loc: vuẹiʹvest
## (5) Sg.Com: vueiʹvin
## (6) Ess: vuẹiʹvven
## (7) Par: vuẹiʹvved
## (8) Pl.Acc: vueiʹvid
## (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: vuäivaž
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-vueivv**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) vuäivv-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) vuẹiʹv-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) vuäiʹvv- Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 204)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: Sg.Com, Pl.Obl
Lowered: ELSE  ẹ, ä
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate Variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
## (1) Sg.Nom: čuäʹrvv
## (2) Pl.Nom: čuẹʼrv
## (3) Sg.Ill: čuärvva
## (4) Sg.Loc: čuẹʹrvest
## (5) Sg.Com: čueʹrvin
## (6) Ess: čuäʹrvven
## (7) Par: čuäʹrvved
## (8) Pl.Acc: čueʹrvid
## (9) Der/Dimin.N.Sg.Nom: čuärvaž
NumContLex="1.113"
* Yaml: **N-chuaervv**
* There are several stem types
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) čuärvv-
* :%^PALẸ%^PAL%^YXX2YX E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) čuẹʹrv-
* :%^PAL  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) čuäʹrvv Ess+Px..

*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) vuâss-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) vueʹss-
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) vueʹsˈs Ess+Px..

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: ELSE
Lowered: Sg.Ill
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-jeaggj**
* There are several stem types 
*  A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	      (3) jeägˈga
* :%^PAL A-02_E-STEM_SG-NOM ;        (1) jeäʹǧˈǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC A-02_E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	  (2) jiẹʹǧǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC A-02_PL-NOM ;	  (2) jiẹʹǧǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;   (4) jiẹʹǧǧest
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC A-02_SG-COM_IN ;   (5) jieʹǧǧin
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC A-02_E-STEM_PL-OBL ;   (5) jieʹǧǧin
* :%^PAL%>e A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	  (6) jeäʹǧˈǧen, (7) jeäʹǧˈǧed

* :%^CCC2CC A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; 	      			  (9) jeäggaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;				  (10) jeägˈg-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^CCC2CAllegro E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) jiẹˈʹǧ-
* :%^PAL E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;			    (12) jeäʹǧˈǧ
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;   (2)

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (vowel shift)
Raised: ELSE
Lowered: Sg.Ill
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-jeaggj**
* There are several stem types 
*  A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	      (3) jeägˈga
* :%^PAL%^PALK A-02_E-STEM_SG-NOM ;        (1) jeäʹǧˈǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK A-02_E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;	  (2) jiẹʹǧǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK A-02_PL-NOM ;	  (2) jiẹʹǧǧ
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK%>e A-02_SG-LOC ;   (4) jiẹʹǧǧest
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK A-02_SG-COM_IN ;   (5) jieʹǧǧin
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK A-02_E-STEM_PL-OBL ;   (5) jieʹǧǧin
* :%^PAL%^PALK%>e A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	  (6) jeäʹǧˈǧen, (7) jeäʹǧˈǧed

* :%^CCC2CC A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH ; 	      			  (9) jeäggaž
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;				  (10) jeägˈg-
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^CCC2CAllegro%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) jiẹˈʹǧ-
* :%^PAL%^PALK E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;			    (12) jeäʹǧˈǧ
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;   (2)

* LEXICON A-02_E-STEM_SG-NOM  (1)

* LEXICON A-02_E-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN  (2)
e.g. +Sg+Acc+PxPl3
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg1

* LEXICON A-02_E-STEM_SG-ILL  (3)

* LEXICON A-02_E-STEM_N_KUYLAZH  (9)

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180, 197-199)
## 1.3 Sg.Loc in -est (no vowel shift, all lowered)
e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.3.2 Sg.Ill vowel -a
## 1.3.2.1 Has Palatalization
Palatalized: ELSE
Not Palatalized: Sg.Ill
## 1.3.2.1.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.3.2.1.1.1[] (Diphthong + Consonant and Geminate variation)
Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com, Dim
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-jeaerggj, N-keadgg**
* There are several stem types 
* jeäʹrǧǧ:jeäʹrǧǧ
*  E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;    (10) jeärgg-
* :%^PALẸ%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;  (11) jiẹʹrj-
* :%^PAL%^PALK  E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;  (12) jeäʹrmm Ess+Px..

WHAT IS THIS CLASS

* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV A-02_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   paar-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^PAL A-02_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;   paaʹr-

e.g.
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg1

## CLASS 2 NOMINALS with high stem vowel and i-stems

* LEXICON A-01_JUURD  juurd:jurdd
is for nouns with stem *i* + *-est* +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the *i* does not occur in +Par 
N_GEN2I-ILLAX3-LOCEX3-NOM1X1
* Yaml: **N-juurd**
* There are several stem types 
* juurd:juurd

* LEXICON A_KOSSI  kõssi:kõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}ss
* LEXICON A-01_KOSSI  kõssi:kõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}ss

* LEXICON A_WLLI  õlli+A:õ%^1VOW%{ʼØ%}ll

* LEXICON A-01_MAADD  maadd:madd
is for nouns with stem *i* + *-est* +Sg+Loc; all stem other than the +Sg+Nom are X3; the *i* does not occur in +Par 
* Yaml: **N-maadd**
* There are several stem types 
* maadd:maadd
strong_geminate, long_vowel, no-palatalization, high_stem_vowel
strong_geminate, short_vowel, no-palatalization, high_stem_vowel

CLASS 2 NOMINALS with low stem vowel and u-stems
## u-stems

CLASS 2 NOMINALS with high stem vowel and â-stems

CLASS 3 HIGH VOWEL, MONOPHTHONG, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
## m-stems
